South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4730.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Contractor licensure exemptions, single-pole billboard work added SECTION 1.    Section 40-11-360(11) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (11) The installation, repair, or maintenance of signs, billboards, or single-pole billboard structures; provided, however, an electrical license is required to perform a final connection to a branch circuit conductor. The installation or modification of a branch circuit conductor is not considered a part of the installation, repair, or maintenance of a sign, billboard, or single-pole billboard structure. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________